Utah statutes.
63I-1-235.   Repeal dates, Title 35A.

(1)  Title 35A, Utah Workforce Services Code, is repealed July 1, 2015.

(2)  Title 35A, Chapter 8, Part 7, Utah Housing Corporation Act, is repealed July 1, 2016.

(3)  Title 35A, Chapter 8, Part 18, Transitional Housing and Community Development Advisory Council, is repealed July 1, 2014.



Amended by Chapter 278, 2013 General Session

